Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-648
City manager; bond; premium; payment.

Before taking office the city manager shall file with the city clerk a surety company bond, conditioned upon the honest and faithful performance of his or her duties, in such sum as shall be fixed by the city council. The premium of such bond shall be paid by the city.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 49, p. 511;

C.S.1922, § 4586;

C.S.1929, § 19-649;

R.S.1943, § 19-648;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 55.